Maryland, session 2026, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–107.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM”
MEANS AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM THROUGH WHICH A QUALIFIED
VOTER MAY RECEIVE, MARK, AND RETURN A BALLOT AND THAT MAINTAINS
REASONABLE DATA SECURITY AND VOTER INTEGRITY PROTECTIONS, INCLUDING:
(1) SECURITY AUDITABILITY;
(2) END–TO–END ENCRYPTION;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1066*

HOUSE BILL 1066
(3) END–TO–END VERIFIABILITY;
(4) MULTIFACTOR AUTHENTICATION;
(5) AIR–GAPPING;
(6) A PROCESS FOR PRINTING DECRYPTED BALLOTS TO CREATE A
PAPER RECORD; AND
(7) BIOMETRIC OR EQUIVALENT DIGITAL IDENTITY VERIFICATION
TECHNOLOGIES.
(B) A MUNICIPALITY MAY CONDUCT A MUNICIPAL ELECTION THROUGH THE
USE OF A QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.
(C) A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT USE INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM A VOTER
USING A QUALIFIED ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM IN A MUNICIPAL
ELECTION FOR ANY PURPOSE OTHER THAN ELECTION ADMINISTRATION AND VOTER
PARTICIPATION STATISTICS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.